src/phonetics/text2ipa-bxr.xfscript
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ===================================== !
! Phonological converter for South Sámi !
! ===================================== !

! This file tries out conversion from Sámi orthography to a phonetic
! translation based upon IPA. There is a switch at the end to get 
! SAMPA instaead

! Usage:
! make GTLANG=sma
! cat text | preprocess | lookup -flags mbTT bin/phon-sma.fst | ..


! We might also add syllable boundaries. Here the simple version:
!cat text | preprocess | lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/hyphrules-sma.fst | cut -f2 | lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/phon-sma.fst | cut -f2 | tr '\n' ' '  | see

! echo "dïhte lea 123" | preprocess | 
! lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/sma-num.fst | cut -f2 |
! lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/hyphrules-sma.fst | cut -f2 | 
! lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/phon-sma.fst | cut -f2 | tr '\n' ' ' | l


echo <<defining Cns and Vow...>>


define Vow       [ А | Е | Ё | И | О | Ө | У | Ү | Ы | Э | Ю | Я |
                   а | е | ё | и | о | ө | у | ү | ы | э | ю | я  ] ;

define Cns [ Б | В | Г | Д | Ж | З | Й | К | Л | М | Н | П | Р | С | Т | Ф | Х | Һ | Ц | Ч | Ш | Щ | Ь | Ъ |
	  б | в | г | д | ж | з | й | к | л | м | н | п | р | с | т | ф | х | һ | ц | ч | ш | щ | ь | ъ ] ; 

define Sgm [ Vow | Cns ] ;

define Stop [ p | t | k | c | č | ʧ ] ;

define Alv [ t | T | d | D | ŧ | Ŧ | đ | Đ | s | S | l | L | r | R | n | N ] ;

define Son [ m | n | ŋ | ɲ | l | r | j | v | đ ] ;

define Nas [ м | н ] ;

!define Dummy %^SL ;

define Syll Cns* Vow+ (ː) Cns*  ;
! define Syll Cns* Vow+ Cns* (Dummy) Cns* (ə) %^ ;


echo << Rules>>

define down [ A -> a, Á -> á, B -> b, C -> c, Č -> č, D -> d, E -> e, F -> f, 
              G -> g, H -> h, I -> i, J -> j, K -> k, L -> l, M -> m, N -> n, 
              Ŋ -> ŋ, O -> o, P -> p, Q -> q, R -> r, S -> s, Š -> š, T -> t, 
              U -> u, V -> v, W -> w, X -> x, Y -> y, Z -> z, Ž -> ž, Æ -> æ, 
              Ø -> ø, Å -> å, Ö -> ö, Ä -> ä, Ï -> i  ] ;


define test а -> б ;


echo << And now we go for IPA OUTPUTFORMAT >>

define OUTPUTFORMAT a -> ɑ , ä -> æ , ö -> ø , n j -> ɲ , š -> ʃ , ï -> ɨ , %^ -> %. ;

define COLONLENGTH   ɑ ɑ -> ɑ ː , e e -> e ː , i i -> i ː , o o -> o ː , u u -> u ː ,
                     y y -> y ː , ø ø -> ø ː , æ æ -> æ ː , ʉ ʉ -> ʉ ː , ɔ ɔ -> ɔ ː ,
                     b b -> b ː , β β -> β ː , ɸ ɸ -> ɸ ː , ɟ ɟ -> ɟ ː , c c -> c ː , 
                     d d -> d ː , ð ð -> ð ː , f f -> f ː , g g -> g ː , 
                     h h -> h ː , j j -> j ː , k k -> k ː , l l -> l ː , ʎ ʎ -> ʎ ː ,
                     m m -> m ː , n n -> n ː , ɲ ɲ -> ɲ ː , p p -> p ː , r r -> r ː , 
                     s s -> s ː , t t -> t ː , ʃ ʃ -> ʃ ː , v v -> v ː ,
                    l̥ l̥  -> l̥ ː , r̥ r̥  -> r̥ ː , m̥ m̥ -> m̥ ː , n̥ n̥ -> n̥ ː , 
                    ŋ̊ ŋ̊ -> ŋ̊ ː , v̥ v̥ -> v̥ ː ,
                     ŋ ŋ -> ŋ ː ;

! Cleaning up
! define DummyDeletion Dummy -> 0 ;


echo <<Combining...>>

read regex [ 
    down 
.o. test
.o. OUTPUTFORMAT
.o. COLONLENGTH

] ;

echo <<Inverting...>>




!  For reference: The SAMPA - IPA correspondence

!  SAMPA   IPA  Description
!  p       p    voiceless bilabial stop
!  b       b    voiced bilabial stop
!  t       t    voiceless alveolar or dental stop
!  d       d    voiced alveolar or dental stop
!  ts      ʦ    voiceless alveolar affricate
!  dz      ʣ    voiced alveolar affricate
!  tS      ʧ    voiceless postalveolar affricate
!  dZ      ʤ    voiced postalveolar affricate
!  c       c    voiceless palatal stop
!  J\      ɟ    (overstroked j)    voiced palatal stop
!  k       k    voiceless velar stop
!  g       g    voiced velar stop
!  q       q    voiceless uvular stop
!  p\      ɸ    (Greek phi)    voiceless bilabial fricative
!  B       β    (Greek beta)    voiced bilabial fricative
!          ϐ    (Greek beta alt)    voiced bilabial approximant
!  f       f    voiceless labiodental fricative
!  v       v    voiced labiodental fricative
!  T       θ    (Greek theta)    voiceless dental fricative
!          ϑ    (Greek theta alt)    voiceless dental approximant
!  D       ð    (Icelandic eth)    voiced dental fricative
!          δ    (Greek delta)    voiced dental approximant
!  s       s    voiceless alveolar fricative
!  z       z    voiced alveolar fricative
!  S       ʃ    voiceless postalveolar fricative
!  Z       ʒ    voiced postalveolar fricative
!  C       ç    (cedilla)    voiceless palatal fricative
!  j\ (jj) ʝ    (j with crossed tail)    voiced palatal fricative
!  x       x    voiceless velar fricative
!  G       γ    (Greek gamma)    voiced velar fricative
!          ɰ    voiced velar approximant
!  X\      ħ    (overstroked h)    voiceless pharyngeal fricative
!  ?\      ʕ    (Inverted ?)    voiced pharyngeal fricative
!  h       h    voiceless glottal approximant
!  h\      ɦ    (h with upper tail to the right)    voiced glottal approximant
!  m       m    bilabial nasal
!  F       ɱ    (m with downward right tail)    labiodental nasal
!  n       n    alveolar or dental nasal
!  J       ɲ    (n with downward left tail)    palatal nasal
!  N       ŋ    (n with downward right tail)    velar nasal
!  l       l    alveolar lateral
!  L       ʎ    turned down y, alt. λ (Greek lambda)    palatal lateral
!  5       ɫ    (l with middle tilde)    velarized dental lateral
!  4 (r)   ɾ    (r without upper-left serif)    alveolar flap
!  r (rr)  r    alveolar trill
!  r\      ɹ    (r rotated 180°)    retroflexed alveolar approximant
!  R       ʀ    (small capital R)    uvular trill
!  P       ʋ    labiodental approximant
!  w       w    velo-labial approximant
!  H       ɥ    (turned down h)    palato-labial approximant
!  j       j    palatal approximant
!  
!  Vowels
!                front   near-front    central   near-back   back
!  close          i • y               1 • }                 M • u
!  near-close              I • Y                    U
!  close-mid      e • 2              @\ • 8                 7 • o
!  mid                                  @            
!  open-mid       E • 9               3 • 3\                V • O
!  near-open        {                    6           
!  open           a • &                                     A • Q



! More documentation

!! retroflex plosive, voiceless			t`  ʈ	    0288, 648 (` = ASCII 096)
!! retroflex plosive, voiced			d`	ɖ		0256, 598
!! labiodental nasal					F 	ɱ		0271, 625
!! retroflex nasal						n` 	ɳ		0273, 627
!! palatal nasal						J 	ɲ		0272, 626
!! velar nasal							N 	ŋ		014B, 331
!! uvular nasal							N\	ɴ		0274, 628
!! 	
!! bilabial trill						B\ 	ʙ		0299, 665
!! uvular trill							R\ 	ʀ		0280, 640
!! alveolar tap							4	ɾ		027E, 638
!! retroflex flap						r` 	ɽ		027D, 637
!! bilabial fricative, voiceless		p\ 	ɸ		0278, 632
!! bilabial fricative, voiced			B 	β		03B2, 946
!! dental fricative, voiceless			T 	θ		03B8, 952
!! dental fricative, voiced				D 	ð		00F0, 240
!! postalveolar fricative, voiceless	S	ʃ		0283, 643
!! postalveolar fricative, voiced		Z 	ʒ		0292, 658
!! retroflex fricative, voiceless		s` 	ʂ		0282, 642
!! retroflex fricative, voiced			z` 	ʐ		0290, 656
!! palatal fricative, voiceless			C 	ç		00E7, 231
!! palatal fricative, voiced			j\ 	ʝ		029D, 669
!! velar fricative, voiced	        	G 	ɣ		0263, 611
!! uvular fricative, voiceless			X	χ		03C7, 967
!! uvular fricative, voiced				R 	ʁ		0281, 641
!! pharyngeal fricative, voiceless		X\ 	ħ		0127, 295
!! pharyngeal fricative, voiced			?\ 	ʕ		0295, 661
!! glottal fricative, voiced			h\	ɦ		0266, 614
!! 
!! alveolar lateral fricative, vl.		K 
!! alveolar lateral fricative, vd.		K\
!! 
!! labiodental approximant				P (or v\) 
!! alveolar approximant					r\ 
!! retroflex approximant				r\` 
!! velar approximant					M\
!! 
!! retroflex lateral approximant		l` 
!! palatal lateral approximant			L 
!! velar lateral approximant			L\
!! Clicks
!! 
!! bilabial								O\	(O = capital letter) 
!! dental								|\
!! (post)alveolar						!\ 
!! palatoalveolar						=\ 
!! alveolar lateral						|\|\
!! Ejectives, implosives
!! 
!! ejective								_>	e.g. ejective p		p_>
!! implosive							_<	e.g. implosive b	b_<
!! Vowels
!! 
!! close back unrounded					M
!! close central unrounded 				1 
!! close central rounded				} 
!! lax i								I 
!! lax y								Y 
!! lax u								U
!! 
!! close-mid front rounded				2 
!! close-mid central unrounded			@\ 
!! close-mid central rounded			8 
!! close-mid back unrounded				7
!! 
!! schwa	ə							@
!! 
!! open-mid front unrounded				E 
!! open-mid front rounded				9
!! open-mid central unrounded			3 
!! open-mid central rounded				3\ 
!! open-mid back unrounded				V 
!! open-mid back rounded				O
!! 
!! ash (ae digraph)						{ 
!! open schwa (turned a)				6
!! 
!! open front rounded					& 
!! open back unrounded	        		A 
!! open back rounded					Q
!! Other symbols
!! 
!! voiceless labial-velar fricative		W 
!! voiced labial-palatal approx.		H 
!! voiceless epiglottal fricative		H\ 
!! voiced epiglottal fricative			<\ 
!! epiglottal plosive					>\
!! 
!! alveolo-palatal fricative, vl. 		s\ 
!! alveolo-palatal fricative, voiced	z\ 
!! alveolar lateral flap				l\ 
!! simultaneous S and x					x\ 
!! tie bar								_
!! Suprasegmentals
!! 
!! primary stress						" 
!! secondary stress						% 
!! long									: 
!! half-long							:\ 
!! extra-short							_X 
!! linking mark							-\
!! Tones and word accents
!! 
!! level extra high						_T 
!! level high							_H
!! level mid							_M 
!! level low							_L 
!! level extra low						_B
!! downstep								! 
!! upstep								^	(caret, circumflex)
!! 
!! contour, rising						 
!! contour, falling						_F 
!! contour, high rising					_H_T 
!! contour, low rising					_B_L 
!! 
!! contour, rising-falling				_R_F 
!! (NB Instead of being written as diacritics with _, all prosodic 
!! marks can alternatively be placed in a separate tier, set off 
!! by < >, as recommended for the next two symbols.)
!!
!! global rise						<R> 
!! global fall						<F>
!!									
!! Diacritics						
!! 									
!! voiceless						_0	(0 = figure), e.g. n_0
!! voiced							_v 
!! aspirated						_h 
!! more rounded						_O	(O = letter) 
!! less rounded						_c 
!! advanced							_+
!! retracted						_-
!! centralized						_" 
!! syllabic							=	(or _=) e.g. n= (or n_=) 
!! non-syllabic						_^ 
!! rhoticity						`
!! 									
!! breathy voiced					_t 
!! creaky voiced					_k
!! linguolabial						_N 
!! labialized						_w 
!! palatalized						'	(or _j) e.g. t' (or t_j) 
!! velarized						_G 
!! pharyngealized					_?\
!! 									
!! dental							_d 
!! apical							_a 
!! laminal							_m
!! nasalized						~	(or _~) e.g. A~ (or A_~) 
!! nasal release					_n
!! lateral release					_l 
!! no audible release				_}
!! 
!! velarized or pharyngealized		_e 
!! velarized l, alternatively		5 
!! raised							_r 
!! lowered							_o 
!! advanced tongue root				_A 
!! retracted tongue root			_q
